District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.08c

Sports Facilities Account.

(a)

There is established the Sports Facilities Account (“Account”) as a nonlapsing account within the General Fund of the District of Columbia, which shall be used solely for the maintenance and upkeep of the Robert F. Kennedy Memorial Stadium and the nonmilitary portion of the Armory.

(b)

(1)

In accordance with § 10-1202.02b(a)(1), the Authority shall transfer from the Sports and Entertainment Fund established by § 10-1202.08b to the Account an amount equal to the budget authority for maintenance and operation of the Robert F. Kennedy Memorial Stadium and the nonmilitary portion of the Armory on October 1 of each year.

(2)

Funds deposited into the Account pursuant to this subsection shall be maintained in segregated sub-accounts associated with each revenue source, as the Chief Financial Officer determines to be necessary.

(3)

The funds deposited into the Account shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for maintenance and operation of the Robert F. Kennedy Memorial Stadium and the nonmilitary portion of the Armory without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 208c
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2081(l), 57 DCR 181

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2081(l) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2081(l) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Emergency Legislation